District of Columbia statutes.
31-3424

Statutory construction and relationship to other laws.

(a)

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, provisions of insurance laws and provisions of hospital or medical service corporation laws shall not be applicable to any health maintenance organization granted a certificate of authority under this chapter. This provision shall not apply to an insurer or hospital or medical service corporation licensed and regulated pursuant to the insurance laws of the District except with respect to its health maintenance organization activities authorized and regulated pursuant to this chapter.

(b)

Solicitation of enrollees by a health maintenance organization granted a certificate of authority, or its representatives, shall not be construed to violate any provision of law relating to solicitation or advertising by health professionals.

(c)

Any health maintenance organization authorized under this chapter shall not be deemed to be practicing medicine and shall be exempt from the provisions set forth by the Board of Medicine relating to the practice of medicine.

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-235, § 26, 44 DCR 818
1981 Ed., § 35-4524.